Utah statutes.
53A-25b-401.   Educators exempt from Department of Human Resource Management rules -- Collective bargaining agreement.

(1)  Educators employed by the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind are exempt from mandatory compliance with rules of the Department of Human Resource Management.

(2)  The board may enter into a collective bargaining agreement to establish compensation and other personnel policies with educators employed by the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind to replace rules of the Department of Human Resource Management.

(3)  A collective bargaining agreement made under Subsection (2) is subject to the same requirements that are imposed on local school boards by Section 53A-3-411.

